test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_paavir_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - päävir: # MLO, ok 
    päävir+N+Sg+Nom: päävir
    päävir+N+Sg+Gen: pááppár
    päävir+N+Sg+Acc: pááppár
    päävir+N+Sg+Ill: pápárân
    päävir+N+Sg+Loc: pápárist
    päävir+N+Sg+Com: pápáráin
    päävir+N+Sg+Abe: pááppárttáá
    päävir+N+Ess: [pävirin, pápárin]
    päävir+N+Par: [pävirid, pápárid]
    päävir+N+Pl+Nom: pápáreh
    päävir+N+Pl+Gen: pápárij
    päävir+N+Pl+Acc: pápárijd
    päävir+N+Pl+Ill: pápáráid
    päävir+N+Pl+Loc: pápárijn
    päävir+N+Pl+Com: [pápárijguin, pápárijgijn]
    päävir+N+Pl+Abe: pápárijttáá

  Noun - jäävvil: # MLO, ok 
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Nom: jäävvil
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Gen: jáhháál
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Acc: jáhháál
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Ill: jáhálân
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Loc: jáhálist
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Com: jáháláin
    jäävvil+N+Sg+Abe: jáhháálttáá
    jäävvil+N+Ess: [jävilin, jáhálin]
    jäävvil+N+Par: [jävilid, jáhálid]
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Nom: jáháleh
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Gen: jáhálij
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Acc: jáhálijd
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Ill: jáháláid
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Loc: jáhálijn
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Com: [jáhálijguin, jáhálijgijn]
    jäävvil+N+Pl+Abe: jáhálijttáá

  Noun - naver: # MLO, ok; ess. often also naharin; par naharid; not according to the paradigm but could be accepted.
    naver+N+Sg+Nom: naver
    naver+N+Sg+Gen: nahhaar
    naver+N+Sg+Acc: nahhaar
    naver+N+Sg+Ill: naharân
    naver+N+Sg+Loc: naharist
    naver+N+Sg+Com: naharáin
    naver+N+Sg+Abe: nahhaarttáá
    naver+N+Ess: [naverin, naharin]
    naver+N+Par: [naverid, naharid]
    naver+N+Pl+Gen: naharij
    naver+N+Pl+Acc: naharijd
    naver+N+Pl+Ill: naharáid
    naver+N+Pl+Loc: naharijn
    naver+N+Pl+Com: [naharijguin, naharijgijn]
    naver+N+Pl+Abe: naharijttáá

  Noun - käävir: # MLO, ok; ess. often also kähirin; par kähirid; see above
    käävir+N+Sg+Nom: käävir
    käävir+N+Sg+Gen: käähir
    käävir+N+Sg+Acc: käähir
    käävir+N+Sg+Ill: kähirân
    käävir+N+Sg+Loc: kähirist
    käävir+N+Sg+Com: kähiráin
    käävir+N+Sg+Abe: käähirttáá
    käävir+N+Ess: [kävirin, kähirin]
    käävir+N+Par: [kävirid, kähirid]
    käävir+N+Pl+Nom: kähireh
    käävir+N+Pl+Gen: kähirij
    käävir+N+Pl+Acc: kähirijd
    käävir+N+Pl+Ill: kähiráid
    käävir+N+Pl+Loc: kähirijn
    käävir+N+Pl+Com: [kähirijguin, kähirijgijn]
    käävir+N+Pl+Abe: kähirijttáá
